Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Inchoate Offenses
§ 6-1-303.
Conspiracy; renunciation of criminal intention; venue.

A person is guilty of conspiracy to commit a crime if he agrees with one (1) or more persons that they or one (1) or more of them will commit a crime and one (1) or more of them does an overt act to effect the objective of the agreement.

A person is not liable under this section if after conspiring he withdraws from the conspiracy and thwarts its success under circumstances manifesting voluntary and complete renunciation of his criminal intention.

A conspiracy may be prosecuted in the county where the agreement was entered into, or in any county where any act evidencing the conspiracy or furthering the purpose took place.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Harmless error. —

Where defendant and three others were found by police in a vehicle that matched the description of a vehicle that was parked outside a building and defendant's co-conspirators testified that they had planned to take TVs and metal from the building, he was convicted of conspiracy to commit burglary. The district court's error in denying defendant's request to subpoena handwriting exemplars from a co-conspirator's statement was harmless as the uncontradicted evidence established that the co-conspirator had written notes encouraging others to implicate defendant. West v. State, 2013 WY 128, 311 P.3d 157,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2013).

Jurisdiction. —

Where defendant was convicted of conspiracy in Wyoming in connection with methamphetamine manufacturing in Colorado and asserted that the only thing that occurred in Wyoming was the purchase of cold tablets, which was not a crime, and all other actions transpired in Colorado, the Wyoming courts still had jurisdiction because the conspiracy continued and was reaffirmed in Wyoming, and the overt act, which was central to the purpose of the conspiracy, occurred in Wyoming. Innis v. State, 2003 WY 66, 69 P.3d 413,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2003).

Not necessary for overt act to be substantive crime charged. —

All that is necessary to prove a prima facie case of conspiracy is any overt act that establishes the criminal agreement was acted upon in some way; it is not necessary that an overt act be the substantive crime charged. Burk v. State, 848 P.2d 225,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1993).

Evidence from uncharged co-conspirator not precluded. —

A conspiracy need not be charged for a joint venturer to be considered a co-conspirator, and evidence from persons not charged is not precluded from consideration as to the individuals charged with conspiracy. Bigelow v. State, 768 P.2d 558,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1989).

Bragging of co-conspirator admissible. —

While mere bragging does not satisfy the “in furtherance” requirement for establishing a conspiracy, the boasts can be admissible under the co-conspirator exception to the hearsay rule when the declarant uses the information to obtain the confidence of the co-conspirator. Bigelow v. State, 768 P.2d 558,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1989).

Sufficient evidence to permit court to reasonably infer that conspiracy existed, such as to admit statements of co-conspirator. —

See Burke v. State, 746 P.2d 852,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 550

(Wyo. 1987).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction for conspiracy to commit first-degree murder. —

See Rands v. State, 818 P.2d 44,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1991).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction for conspiracy to escape from official detention. —

Sufficient evidence supported an inmate's convictions for first-degree premeditated murder, first-degree felony murder, attempt to escape from official detention, and conspiracy to escape from official detention where evidence showed the inmate (1) participated in the concerted attack upon a penitentiary's shift command center and the murder of a prison guard, (2) exultantly cried thereafter that “we got one of them,” and (3) attempted, along with two other inmates, to scale the razor wire fencing surrounding the penitentiary. Moreover, appropriate inferences from all the evidence were that the inmate intended that an escape would occur and intended that the guard be killed during the attempted escape. Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 835, 126 S. Ct. 63, 163 L. Ed. 2d 90, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6229 (U.S. 2005).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction for conspiracy. —

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant of conspiracy to commit aggravated burglary, aggravated robbery, and aggravated assault and battery as the State presented evidence that defendant and the accomplice agreed to use the gun during the incident at the golf course because the golf course’s manager testified that after he hit defendant in the head with the flashlight, defendant turned and ran away; the manager then heard someone saying to shoot him; seconds later, the manager heard a gunshot and saw a muzzle flash; and it was reasonable for the jury to infer that the accomplice would have only said to shoot the manager if he knew defendant had a gun in his possession. Jordin v. State, 2018 WY 64, 419 P.3d 527,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction for conspiracy to commit aggravated assault and battery. —

Evidence was sufficient to support the jury's findings that there was a conspiracy to commit aggravated assault and battery and that defendant acted with specific intent; although the plan to beat up a third person may have been crude and ill-conceived and entered into only after a long drinking bout, there was evidence that the “plan” to beat up a business owner using an axe handle rose to the level of a conspiracy, and that defendant acted with specific intent to further the plan. Hankinson v. State, 2002 WY 86, 47 P.3d 623,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2002).

Sufficient evidence for conviction of conspiracy to commit robbery. —

See Porth v. State, 868 P.2d 236,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1994).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for conspiracy to commit aggravated robbery where five coconspirators and/or accomplices testified that defendant was the leader of the plan to rob the bank and did most of the talking during the planning discussions. Vlahos v. State, 2003 WY 103, 75 P.3d 628,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 2003).

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conspiracy to commit aggravated robbery because defendant confessed that he and others agreed to contact the victim to arrange a meeting with the victim to rob him, the group obtained knives to use as leverage in the proposed robbery, and after meeting with the victim, the robbery plan was executed. The conspiracy included a contingency plan that if the victim resisted, they would kill him; that circumstance came to pass.
Lemus v. State, 2007 WY 111, 162 P.3d 497,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2007).

There was
sufficient evidence to support a conviction for conspiracy to commit
robbery because, even though the case was circumstantial, the jury
was justified to believe that the circumstances pointed toward the
fact that defendant was in agreement with his brother to snatch a
purse in a parking lot. Defendant was in the parking lot with his
brother when the victim was robbed, a police chase ensued, defendant
and his brother ran from police, and two guns, the purse, and a bandana
were found where defendant and his brother ran. Oldman v. State, 2015 WY 121, 359 P.3d 964,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2015).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction for conspiracy to commit larceny by a bailee. —

Sufficient evidence supported defendant's conviction for six counts of receiving stolen property and conspiracy to commit larceny by a bailee, because she received funds from an unauthorized account based on checks issued by her mother. It was reasonable to infer that they had the kind of agreement necessary to sustain a conspiracy charge under this section.
Remmick v. State, 2012 WY 57, 275 P.3d 467,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 2012).

Insufficient evidence. —

Where the State presented no evidence of an agreement between one or more persons to commit a crime, defendant's conspiracy to engage in a clandestine laboratory was reversed.
Holzheuser v. State, 2007 WY 160, 169 P.3d 68,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 2007).

Instructions as to object crime must be in same manner as crime charged. —

The trial court should instruct the jury about the object crime in a conspiracy prosecution in the same manner as it would instruct on the crime charged. Miller v. State, 904 P.2d 344,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1995).

Jury should be instructed on relevant law. —

Where the law of the case established that the jury needed to determine whether and when a co-conspirator was a government agent, the jury should have been instructed adequately on the general principles of the relevant law which they were to apply to the factual issues. Miller v. State, 904 P.2d 344,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1995).

Consistency of case theories in jury instructions. —

Even though the bilateral theory of conspiracy was given to the jury in defendant's first trial, Wyoming follows the majority of states in applying the unilateral theory to the crime of conspiracy, and the court correctly instructed the jury on that theory in defendant's second trial. Miller v. State, 955 P.2d 892,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1998).

Consecutive sentences constitutional. —

Consecutive sentences for felony murder and conspiracy to commit aggravated robbery did not violate the double jeopardy clauses of the United States and Wyoming constitutions, where the evidence necessary to support the conspiracy charge was not the same as the evidence necessary to support the felony murder charge. Garcia v. State, 774 P.2d 623,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1989).

Evidence sufficient to sustain conviction for conspiracy to
commit aggravated burglary.—

Sufficient
evidence was presented to support defendant's conviction for conspiracy
to commit aggravated burglary because the evidence established that
defendant and an accomplice tacitly agreed to enter the victim's
apartment
without authority to commit a felony, were armed with a
deadly weapon,
and inflicted bodily injury on the victim by stabbing
the victim numerous
times. Johnson v. State, 2015 WY 118, 356 P.3d 767,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2015).

Punishment for felony murder and underlying felony unconstitutional. —

The imposition of multiple punishments for felony murder and the underlying felony violates the double jeopardy clauses of the United States and Wyoming constitutions. Cook v. State, 841 P.2d 1345,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1992).

Condition of probation. —

Where a defendant entered Alford guilty pleas to violating Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-2-502

,

6-4-103

,

6-1-303

, and

6-2-302

, the district court did not abuse its discretion by imposing as a condition of his probation following his term of incarceration that he have no contact with his minor children. A no contact condition was reasonably related to the violent sexual crimes for which he was convicted and for which he was charged, and the provision did not impermissibly encroach on his fundamental right as a parent to raise his children. Perkins v. State, 2014 WY 11, 317 P.3d 584,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995); Nelson v. State, 934 P.2d 1238,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1997); Reilly v. State, 2002 WY 156, 55 P.3d 1259,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983); Jahnke v. State, 682 P.2d 991,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1984); Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984); Schultz v. State, 751 P.2d 367,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1988); Goettl v. State, 842 P.2d 549,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1992); KAA v. State, 2001 WY 24, 18 P.3d 1159,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2001); Large v. State, 2008 WY 22, 177 P.3d 807,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Feb. 28, 2008).

Stated

in

Brown v. State, 703 P.2d 1097,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 519

(Wyo. 1985); Dorador v. State, 711 P.2d 417,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 626

(Wyo. 1985); Collins v. State, 712 P.2d 368,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 451

(Wyo. 1986); Hobbs v. State, 757 P.2d 1008,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1988); Brown v. State, 2002 WY 61, 44 P.3d 97,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Lee v. State, 653 P.2d 1388,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 409

(Wyo. 1982);
State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982);
Duffy v. State, 730 P.2d 754,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 655

(Wyo. 1986);
Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990);
Duffy v. State, 837 P.2d 1047,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 1992);
Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995);
Brown v. State, 953 P.2d 1170,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1998);
Palato v. State, 988 P.2d 512,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1999);
Mazurek v. State, 10 P.3d 531,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2000);
Bush v. State, 2003 WY 156, 79 P.3d 1178,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 186

(Wyo. 2003);
Sinning v. State, 2007 WY 193, 172 P.3d 388,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Dec. 11, 2007);
Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 28, 2011);
Landeroz v. State, 2011 WY 168, 267 P.3d 1075,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Dec. 28, 2011);
Jones v. State, 2012 WY 82, 278 P.3d 729,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(June 14, 2012);
Jacobsen v. State, 2012 WY 105,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Aug 1, 2012); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014); Sen v. State, 2017 WY 30, 390 P.3d 769,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Prosecution or conviction of one conspirator as affected by disposition of case against coconspirators, 19 ALR4th 192.

What constitutes “series of acts or transactions” for purposes of Rule 8(b) of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, providing for joinder of defendants who are alleged to have participated in same series of acts or transactions, 62 ALR Fed 106.

Statute of limitations in prosecution under 18 USC § 371 for conspiracy to commit offense against or to defraud United States, 68 ALR Fed 628.

Federal criminal liability of narcotics conspirator for different substantive crime of other conspirator, 77 ALR Fed 661.

When is conspiracy continuing offense for purposes of statute of limitations under 18 USC § 3282, 109 ALR Fed 616.

§ 6-1-304.
Grading.

The penalty for attempt, solicitation or conspiracy is the same as the penalty for the most serious crime which is attempted, solicited or is an object of the conspiracy except that an attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit a capital crime is not punishable by the death penalty if the capital crime is not committed.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

No mitigating circumstances for attempted kidnapping. —

Trial court properly applied the appropriate penalty range in sentencing defendant to life in prison after defendant was convicted of attempted kidnapping because where there was not a completed kidnapping, but instead an attempted kidnapping, the mitigating circumstances described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-201(c) could not occur.
Rathbun v. State, 2011 WY 116, 257 P.3d 29,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Capwell v. State, 686 P.2d 1148,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1984).

Quoted

in

Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983).

Stated

in

Haight v. State, 654 P.2d 1232,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 416

(Wyo. 1982); Brown v. State, 2002 WY 61, 44 P.3d 97,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2002).

Cited

in

Schultz v. State, 751 P.2d 367,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For case note, “CRIMINAL LAW — Wyoming Limits the Availability of Abandonment as a Defense to Criminal Attempt. Ramirez v. State, 739 P.2d 1214,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 470

(Wyo. 1987),” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 219 (1989).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).